Hawaii statutes.
§445-232 License. Any person who
engages in the business as a scrap dealer shall be licensed with the
treasurer. The treasurer shall have the power to grant license and to revoke
such license upon reasonable cause. The annual license fee shall be $10.

Every license granted under this section shall
designate the place where business is carried on and sufficient identifying
information including the licensee's name, address, general excise tax license
number, and other information which may be prescribed by the treasurer. [L
1976, c 230, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next